Colorado, session 2026A, HB1019.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Chronic kidney disease and end-stage renal disease impose a
severe health and financial burden on Colorado residents. In 2021, over
8,000 Colorado residents were being treated for end-stage renal disease,
with 4,994 of those residents depending on dialysis to stay alive. The annual
insurance costs for chronic kidney disease in Colorado have reached $457
million, with patients paying nearly $58 million out-of-pocket. According
to the centers for disease control and prevention in the federal department
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

of health and human services, one out of every 7 adult Americans has
chronic kidney disease, and up to 90% of those individuals do not know that
they have it. The number of individuals who have chronic kidney disease
is disproportionately higher in minority communities.
(b) Early screening for chronic kidney disease is essential but
currently underutilized in Colorado. Among the 800,206 Coloradans who
have hypertension, diabetes, or both hypertension and diabetes, an estimated
144,217 individuals likely have advanced, stage four or five, chronic kidney
disease, but many remain undiagnosed due to inadequate screening.
Screening is critical because it allows for earlier diagnosis and cheaper
interventions, which prevent the significant rise in cost and strain on the
health-care system that occurs when chronic kidney disease is diagnosed
late and, as a result, is often more advanced.
(c) Early detection through screening is cost-effective and prevents
disease progression. Each comprehensive kidney function screening test
includes serum creatinine, estimated glomerular filtration rate, and urine
albumin-creatinine testing. This modest investment in preventive care can
identify kidney disease at earlier and more treatable stages.
(d) Without early detection, the financial burden of chronic kidney
disease escalates dramatically as the condition progresses. Patient
out-of-pocket expenses rise from an average of $280 annually for stage one
chronic kidney disease to $10,183 for end-stage renal disease.
(e) The kidney disease prevention and education task force,
established pursuant to House Bill 21-1171, enacted in 2021, conducted a
comprehensive study and identified early detection through accessible
screening as critical to reducing both health complications and the financial
strain of kidney disease on Colorado residents and the Colorado health-care
system.
(2) The general assembly further declares that the purpose of this act
is to:
(a) Implement the recommendations of the kidney disease
prevention and education task force by requiring health insurance coverage
for annual preventive kidney function screening services without
cost-sharing requirements;
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1019

(b) Remove financial barriers that currently prevent early diagnosis
of chronic kidney disease, particularly among high-risk populations with
hypertension or diabetes;
(c) Enable timely medical intervention before kidney disease
progresses to costly advanced stages that require dialysis or kidney
transplantation;
(d) Reduce the overall financial burden of kidney disease on
Colorado patients, insurance plans, and state health-care programs through
cost-effective preventive care; and
(e) Improve health outcomes for Colorado residents by facilitating
earlier detection and treatment of chronic kidney disease.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-104, amend
(18)(a)(I) introductory portion; and add (18)(b.8) as follows:
10-16-104. Mandatory coverage provisions - applicability - rules
- legislative declaration - definitions.
(18) Prevention health-care services - legislative declaration -
rules - definitions.
(a) (I) The following policies and contracts that are issued or
renewed in this state must provide coverage for the total cost of the
preventive health-care services specified in subsections (18)(b), (18)(b.3),
and (18)(b.7), AND (18)(b.8) of this section:
(b.8) (I) THE COVERAGE REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION (18) MUST
INCLUDE ANNUAL KIDNEY FUNCTION SCREENING SERVICES DESIGNED TO
IDENTIFY PATIENTS AT RISK FOR CHRONIC KIDNEY DISEASE, INCLUDING
GLOMERULAR FILTRATION RATE, OR "GFR", TESTING AND URINE TESTING
FOR SCREENING ALBUMIN AND CREATININE LEVELS.
(II) ALL LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS ISSUED OR
RENEWED IN THIS STATE ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR KIDNEY FUNCTION SCREENING SERVICES.
(III) (A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (18)(b.8)(III)(B) OF
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1019

THIS SECTION, AND TO THE EXTENT THAT SUCH COVERAGE IS NOT IN
ADDITION TO BENEFITS PROVIDED PURSUANT TO THE STATE BENCHMARK
PLAN REQUIRED PURSUANT TO 45 CFR 156.111, ALL INDIVIDUAL AND SMALL
GROUP HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS ISSUED OR RENEWED IN THIS STATE ON OR
AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028, SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR KIDNEY FUNCTION
SCREENING SERVICES.
(B) SUBSECTION (18)(b.8)(III)(A) OF THIS SECTION IS INOPERATIVE
AND THE STATE SHALL NOT ASSUME AN OBLIGATION FOR THE COVERAGE
REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (18)(b.8)(III)(A) OF THIS SECTION IF
THE DIVISION DETERMINES THAT THE BENEFIT SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION
(18)(b.8)(III)(A) OF THIS SECTION REQUIRES STATE DEFRAYAL OF THE COST
OF COVERAGE PURSUANT TO A PROVISION OF THE FEDERAL ACT, INCLUDING
42 U.S.C. SEC. 18031 (d)(3)(B) OR A SUCCESSOR PROVISION, AND THE
IMPLEMENTING REGULATIONS OR THE STATE IS OTHERWISE REQUIRED TO
DEFRAY THE COST OF COVERAGE REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(18)(b.8)(III)(A) OF THIS SECTION.
(IV) THE COVERAGE REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION (18)(b.8) MAY
BE OFFERED THROUGH A HIGH DEDUCTIBLE PLAN THAT WOULD QUALIFY FOR
A HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNT PURSUANT TO 26 U.S.C. SEC. 223; EXCEPT
THAT A CARRIER MAY APPLY DEDUCTIBLE AMOUNTS FOR THE REQUIRED
COVERAGE IF IT IS NOT CONSIDERED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT
OF THE TREASURY TO BE PREVENTIVE OR TO HAVE AN ACCEPTABLE
DEDUCTIBLE.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-50-605, amend
(1)(f) as follows:
24-50-605. Group benefit plans - specifications - contracts.
(1) (f) The specifications drawn by the director for any group benefit
plans shall MUST include the mandated coverages required by section
10-16-104; C.R.S. EXCEPT THAT THE SPECIFICATIONS ARE NOT REQUIRED TO
INCLUDE COVERAGE FOR KIDNEY FUNCTION SCREENING SERVICES, AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 10-16-104 (18)(b.8).
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1019

12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1019